Utah statutes.
32B-15-203.   Governmental immunity.

This title does not create civil liability on the part of the following arising out of one of the following's actions in regulating, controlling, authorizing, or otherwise being involved in the sale or other distribution of an alcoholic product:

(1)  the state;

(2)  a state agency;

(3)  a state employee;

(4)  the commission;

(5)  the department; or

(6)  a political subdivision.



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

